test/src/dict-gt-yamls/N-lex_viini_dict-gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

  Noun - viini: # ok VIINI
    viini+N+Sg+Nom:   viini
    viini+N+Sg+Gen:   viini
    viini+N+Sg+Ill:   viinin
    viini+N+Sg+Loc:   viinist
    viini+N+Sg+Com:   viinijn
    viini+N+Sg+Abe:   viinittáá
    viini+N+Ess:      viinin
    viini+N+Par:      viinid
    viini+N+Pl+Nom:   viinih
    viini+N+Pl+Gen:   viinij
    viini+N+Pl+Acc:   viinijd
    viini+N+Pl+Ill:   viinijd
    viini+N+Pl+Loc:   viinijn
    viini+N+Pl+Com:   viinijguin
    viini+N+Pl+Abe:   viinijttáá

  Noun - riisi: # ok VIINI
    riisi+N+Sg+Nom:   riisi
    riisi+N+Sg+Gen:   riisi
    riisi+N+Sg+Ill:   riisin
    riisi+N+Sg+Loc:   riisist
    riisi+N+Sg+Com:   riisijn
    riisi+N+Sg+Abe:   riisittáá
    riisi+N+Ess:      riisin
    riisi+N+Par:      riisid
    riisi+N+Pl+Nom:   riisih
    riisi+N+Pl+Gen:   riisij
    riisi+N+Pl+Acc:   riisijd
    riisi+N+Pl+Ill:   riisijd
    riisi+N+Pl+Loc:   riisijn
    riisi+N+Pl+Com:   riisijguin
    riisi+N+Pl+Abe:   riisijttáá
    
  Noun - koori: # ok VIINI
    koori+N+Sg+Nom:   koori
    koori+N+Sg+Gen:   koori
    koori+N+Sg+Acc:   koori
    koori+N+Sg+Ill:   koorin
    koori+N+Sg+Loc:   koorist
    koori+N+Sg+Com:   koorijn
    koori+N+Sg+Abe:  [koorittáá, koˊrittáá]
    koori+N+Ess:      koorin
    koori+N+Par:      koorid
    koori+N+Pl+Nom:   koorih
    koori+N+Pl+Gen:  [koorij, koˊrij]
    koori+N+Pl+Acc:   koorijd
    koori+N+Pl+Ill:   koorijd
    koori+N+Pl+Loc:   koorijn
    koori+N+Pl+Com:   koorijguin
    koori+N+Pl+Abe:   koorijttáá

Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

  Noun - viini: # ok VIINI
    viini+N+Sg+Nom:   viini
    viini+N+Sg+Gen:   viini
    viini+N+Sg+Ill:   viinin
    viini+N+Sg+Loc:   viinist
    viini+N+Sg+Com:   viinijn
    viini+N+Sg+Abe:   viinittáá
    viini+N+Ess:      viinin
    viini+N+Par:      viinid
    viini+N+Pl+Nom:   viinih
    viini+N+Pl+Gen:   viinij
    viini+N+Pl+Acc:   viinijd
    viini+N+Pl+Ill:   viinijd
    viini+N+Pl+Loc:   viinijn
    viini+N+Pl+Com:   viinijguin
    viini+N+Pl+Abe:   viinijttáá

  Noun - riisi: # ok VIINI
    riisi+N+Sg+Nom:   riisi
    riisi+N+Sg+Gen:   riisi
    riisi+N+Sg+Ill:   riisin
    riisi+N+Sg+Loc:   riisist
    riisi+N+Sg+Com:   riisijn
    riisi+N+Sg+Abe:   riisittáá
    riisi+N+Ess:      riisin
    riisi+N+Par:      riisid
    riisi+N+Pl+Nom:   riisih
    riisi+N+Pl+Gen:   riisij
    riisi+N+Pl+Acc:   riisijd
    riisi+N+Pl+Ill:   riisijd
    riisi+N+Pl+Loc:   riisijn
    riisi+N+Pl+Com:   riisijguin
    riisi+N+Pl+Abe:   riisijttáá
    
  Noun - koori: # ok VIINI
    koori+N+Sg+Nom:   koori
    koori+N+Sg+Gen:   koori
    koori+N+Sg+Acc:   koori
    koori+N+Sg+Ill:   koorin
    koori+N+Sg+Loc:   koorist
    koori+N+Sg+Com:   koorijn
    koori+N+Sg+Abe:  [koorittáá, koˊrittáá]
    koori+N+Ess:      koorin
    koori+N+Par:      koorid
    koori+N+Pl+Nom:   koorih
    koori+N+Pl+Gen:  [koorij, koˊrij]
    koori+N+Pl+Acc:   koorijd
    koori+N+Pl+Ill:   koorijd
    koori+N+Pl+Loc:   koorijn
    koori+N+Pl+Com:   koorijguin
    koori+N+Pl+Abe:   koorijttáá
